Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
Chapter 45. Permit and Licensing Procedures

§ 25-45-1.
Statement of policy.

It is the policy of the State of Mississippi that each agency of the state shall cooperate to the greatest extent possible with other agencies of the state and agencies of the federal government which have separate but similar, related or interrelated jurisdiction or authority over certain activities performed by or benefits granted to persons or entities within the state, so that (a) the processing and issuing of permits, licenses and other such instruments will be streamlined to reduce costly delays, (b) duplication of effort and unnecessary governmental “red tape” will be reduced, and (c) state policy will be carried out in an effective, efficient, predictable and consistent manner.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 421, § 1(1); reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 418, § 1; reenacted, Laws, 1988, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after June 30, 1988.

§ 25-45-3.
State agencies to develop plans for one-stop permitting; elements of plan.

In order to accomplish the policy set out in Section 25-45-1, each agency of the state shall develop a plan for “one-stop permitting” to coordinate the processing and issuing of permits, licenses and other such instruments by the agency with other state or federal agencies which also require an applicant to obtain a permit, license or other instrument from it or to supply information to it before the applicant may perform certain activities or receive certain benefits. “One-stop permitting” shall enable an applicant for a permit, license or other instrument from an agency of the state to complete all necessary applications at one (1) time and location or to supply enough information to the agency at one (1) time and location so that such agency can process the application or information through any other state or federal agencies necessary for the applicant to obtain authorization to perform the particular activities that he wants to perform or receive the benefits for which he has applied. To the greatest extent possible, each plan for “one-stop permitting” shall provide for the following:

Where practicable, a single application form for all required permits, licenses and other instruments from agencies which have separate but similar, related or interrelated jurisdiction or authority over certain activities performed by or benefits granted to persons or entities within the state; such application form shall contain sufficient information so that the necessary reviews of all affected agencies can be expeditiously carried out;

Consolidated public hearings so that a single public hearing may serve to meet the requirements of the several public hearings as may now be provided by law for issuing permits, licenses and other such instruments by agencies which have separate but similar, related or interrelated jurisdiction or authority over certain activities performed by or benefits granted to persons or entities within the state;

The shortest practicable review period for applications, proper allowances being made for all interested parties to become informed and to make their opinions heard by the appropriate agencies; and

Joint permitting procedures for state and federal agencies.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 421, § 1(2); reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 418, § 2; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1988, ch. 532, § 2, eff from and after June 30, 1988.

§ 25-45-5.
Agencies authorized to enter agreements with state or federal agencies.

Each agency of the state is authorized to enter into agreements with other state agencies and federal agencies in order to implement the “one-stop permitting” required by this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 421, § 1(3); reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 418, § 3; reenacted, Laws, 1988, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after June 30, 1988.

§ 25-45-7.
Agencies to consult with Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services.

Each agency of the state may consult with the Central Data Processing Authority created under the provisions of Section 25-53-1 et seq. in all instances where the Central Data Processing Authority may be of assistance in developing and/or implementing a plan or program for “one-stop permitting.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 421, § 1(4); reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch 418, § 4; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1988, ch. 532, § 4, eff from and after June 30, 1988.

§ 25-45-9.
Powers, duties and responsibilities of agencies not to be altered.

It is the intent of the Legislature that “one-stop permitting” shall expedite the decision-making of all agencies having separate but similar, related or interrelated jurisdiction or authority over certain activities performed by or benefits granted to persons within the state without impinging on the jurisdiction or authority of these agencies. The “one-stop permitting” required by this chapter shall not alter the powers, duties and responsibilities of any agency, its expressed purpose being to improve the procedural operations of these agencies.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 421, § 1(5); reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 418, § 5; reenacted, Laws, 1988, ch. 532, § 5, eff from and after June 30, 1988.

§ 25-45-11.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1988, ch. 532, § 8, eff from and after June 30, 1988.

[En Laws, 1981, ch. 421, § 2; reenacted, 1984 ch. 418, § 6]

§ 25-45-13.
Legislative intent; coordination and implementation of “one-stop permitting” terms and provisions.

It is the intent of the Legislature by Sections 25-45-13 through 25-45-17 to make permitting more effective in order to improve economic development within the State of Mississippi. In accordance with this intent, the Mississippi Department of Economic Development shall coordinate and implement the terms and provisions of Sections 25-45-1 through 25-45-9, which provide for “one-stop permitting,” and serve as liaison between all agencies of the state affected by those sections in order to implement same, through the functions outlined as follows:

Participating in the initial permit contact with industry;

Providing general permit information;

Arranging meetings with pertinent regulatory agencies;

Acting as industry’s advocate in obtaining environmental permits; and

Considering various data bases and other relevant planning information to assist the industrial prospect in the location and permitting process.

A Department of Economic Development representative shall:

Attend all meetings of the permit board created by Section 49-17-28 and all permit considerations by agencies of the State of Mississippi; and

Prepare reports as needed, including incidences of unusual delays in permit issuance, and make recommendations from time to time for improvement of the permit issuance process.

The Department of Economic Development shall prepare and publish:

A directory or inventory of business and industry permits;

A guide to required environmental permits in Mississippi; and

A master permit information form.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 379, §§ 1 (1st ¶), 2; brought forward without change, Laws, 1984, ch 418, § 7; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1988, ch. 532, § 6, eff from and after June 30, 1988.

§ 25-45-15.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1988 ch. 532, § 8, eff from and after June 30, 1988.

[En Laws, 1982, ch. 379, §§ 1 (1st ¶ ), 2; Brought forward without change, 1984, ch. 418, § 7]

§ 25-45-17.
Cooperation of other state agencies.

Each agency within the state shall cooperate to the greatest extent possible with other state agencies and the Department of Economic Development in carrying out the terms, provisions and intent of Sections 25-45-13 through 25-45-17.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 379, § 3; brought forward without change, Laws, 1984, ch. 418, § 9; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1988, ch. 532, § 7, eff from and after June 30, 1988.